Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2707.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 107.5 of Title 43, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Except as provided in paragraph 1 of this subsection, a
court may order additional periods of possession of or access to a
child to compensate for the denial of court-ordered possession or
access.
1. Unless a party shows good cause why the order should not be
rendered, a court shall order additional periods of possession of or
Req. No. 11552 Page 1

acce ss to a child to compensate for a denial of court-ordered
possession or access that resulted from an investigation by the
Department of Human Services that did not result in a finding of
abuse or neglect.
2. The additional periods of possession or access:
a. shall be of the same type and duration of the
possession or access that was denied,
b. may include weekend, holiday, and summer possession or
access, and
c. shall occur on or before the second anniversary of the
date the court finds that court-ordered possession or
access has been denied.
B. The person denied possession or access is entitled to decide
the time of the additional possession or access, subject to the
provisions of paragraph 2 of subsection A of this section.
C. Paragraph 1 of subsection A of this section shall not:
1. Create a cause of action against the Department of Human
Services; or
2. Waive sovereign immunity to suit or liability.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-11552 MAH 01/15/25


Req. No. 11552 Page 2